South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4689.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-23-460(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) if upon the completion of the hearing, the court finds the person unfit to stand trial, it shall order his release from the hospital; provided, however, if such a person has not been hospitalized for a period of time exceeding the maximum possible period of imprisonment to which the person could have been sentenced if convicted as charged, and if the State establishes that the person is a danger to the community if released, the court shall direct the Office of Mental Health to place the person in a secure facility; and SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----